Illinois, session 104th, SB1742.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Rooftop Safety for First Responders Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. In this Act:7    "Court" means an open space on a lot, other than a yard or 8portion of a yard, that is unobstructed from its lowest level 9to the sky and bounded, in whole or part, by abutting property 10lines, exterior building walls or other enclosing devices.11    "Low-sloped roof" mean roof with a slope of less than 2 12units vertical in 12 units horizontal (17% slope).13    "Parapet" means a barrier that extends upward from the 14edge of a structure, such as a roof, balcony, walkway, or 15terrace.16    "Shaft" means a continuous vertical space substantially 17enclosed on all sides that extends for 2 or more floors, 18including, but not limited to, an elevator shaft, a 19ventilation shaft, a stairwell, or a service shaft. 20    Section 10. Low-sloped roof edges and openings. All 21existing buildings, new construction, new roofs, roof 22replacements, and renovation projects that increase the area   SB1742 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 09745 BDA 19811 b1of a home or business by more than 50% are subject to the 2following requirements:3        (1) The edges of a low-sloped roof that adjoin a shaft 4    or a court that is enclosed on all sides shall be provided 5    with a parapet, extended masonry, or guard, or any 6    combination thereof that meets the requirements of Section 7    1015 of the International Building Code.8        (2) All skylights and other openings located in the 9    plane of a low-sloped roof that are not otherwise required 10    to remain open and unobstructed by law shall be either:11            (A) glazed with wired glass, plain glass, glass 12        block, or polycarbonate plastic that is designed and 13        constructed to withstand a minimum dynamic load test 14        of no less than 400 pounds; or15            (B) provided with a parapet, extended masonry, or 16        guard, or any combination thereof, that meets the 17        requirements of Section 1015 of the International 18        Building Code. 19    Section 15. Survey. 20    (a) No later than January 1, 2027, and every 2 years 21thereafter, each municipality shall complete a survey of 22buildings in its jurisdiction that have skylights and other 23openings located in the plane of a low-sloped roof.24    (b) The results of the survey shall be reported in a 25building inventory that shall be shared with local police   SB1742 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 09745 BDA 19811 b1departments and local fire departments.2    (c) In counties with a population greater than 1,000,000, 3the results of the survey shall be shared with local police 4departments and local fire departments and shall be stored in 5all computer-aided dispatch systems.